Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1729.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 1-2-105, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1-2-105. A. 1. Any county office of the Department of


Human Services receiving a child abuse or neglect report shall


promptly respond to the report by initiating an investigation of the


report or an assessment of the family in accordance with priority


guidelines established by the Department. The Department may


prioritize reports of alleged child abuse or neglect based on the


severity and immediacy of the alleged harm to the child. The


Department shall adopt a priority system pursuant to rules


promulgated by the Department. The primary purpose of the


investigation or assessment shall be the protection of the child.

Req. No. 3386 Page 1


For investigations or assessments, the Department shall give special


consideration to the risks of any minor, including a child with a


disability, who is unable to communicate effectively about abuse,


neglect or other safety threat or who is in a vulnerable position


due to the inability to communicate effectively.


2. Any person subject to an investigation pursuant to paragraph


of this subsection may request a hearing to appeal the


investigation’s substantiation. The rules of evidence shall apply


in a hearing pursuant to this paragraph.


3. If an investigation or assessment conducted by the


Department in response to any report of child abuse or neglect shows


that the incident reported was the result of the reasonable exercise


of parental discipline involving the use of ordinary force,


including, but not limited to, spanking, switching, or paddling, the


investigation or assessment will proceed no further and all records


regarding the incident shall be expunged.


B. 1. The investigation or assessment shall include a visit to


the home of the child, unless there is reason to believe that there


is an extreme safety risk to the child or worker or it appears that


the referral has been made in bad faith. The visit shall include an


interview with and examination of the subject child and may be


conducted at any reasonable time and at any place including, but not


limited to, the child’s school. The Department shall notify the


person responsible for the health, safety, and welfare of the child

Req. No. 3386 Page 2


that the child has been interviewed at a school. The investigation


or assessment may include an interview with the parents of the child


or any other person responsible for the health, safety, or welfare


of the child and an interview with and examination of any child in


the home.


2. The investigation or assessment may include a medical,


psychological, or psychiatric examination of any child in the home,


and may include an interview conducted by appropriate personnel


using the protocols and procedures specified in Section 1-9-102 of


this title. If admission to the home, school, or any place where


the child may be located cannot be obtained, then the district court


having jurisdiction, upon application by the district attorney and


upon cause shown, shall order the person responsible for the health,


safety, or welfare of the child, or the person in charge of any


place where the child may be located, to allow entrance for the


interview, the examination, and the investigation or assessment.


The court may order that the child be transported to a location


approved by the court for the interview or examination and designate


an appropriate person or persons to transport the child. Such


persons may include but are not limited to: a relative of the


child; a person responsible for the child’s health, safety, or


welfare; law enforcement personnel; employees of the Department of


Human Services; or employees of the Office of Juvenile Affairs if


the child is in the custody of the Office of Juvenile Affairs. When

Req. No. 3386 Page 3


making this determination, the court shall consider safety protocols


based on the gender of the child. If the person responsible for the


health, safety, or welfare of the child does not consent to a


medical, psychological, or psychiatric examination of the child that


is requested by the Department, the district court having


jurisdiction, upon application by the district attorney and upon


cause shown, shall order the examination to be made at the times and


places designated by the court.


3. The investigation or assessment may include an inquiry into


the possibility that the child or a person responsible for the


health, safety, or welfare of the child has a history of mental


illness. If the person responsible for the child’s health, safety,


or welfare does not allow the Department to have access to


behavioral health records or treatment plans requested by the


Department, which may be relevant to the alleged abuse or neglect,


the district court having jurisdiction, upon application by the


district attorney and upon good cause shown, shall by order allow


the Department to have access to the records pursuant to terms and


conditions prescribed by the court.


4. a. If the court determines that the subject of the


behavioral health records is indigent, the court shall


appoint an attorney to represent that person at the


hearing to obtain behavioral health records.



Req. No. 3386 Page 4


b. A person responsible for the health, safety, or


welfare of the child is entitled to notice and a


hearing when the Department seeks a court order to


allow a psychological or psychiatric examination or


access to behavioral health records.


c. Access to behavioral health records does not


constitute a waiver of confidentiality.


5. The investigation of a report of sexual abuse or serious


physical abuse or both sexual abuse and serious physical abuse shall


be conducted, when appropriate and possible, using a


multidisciplinary team approach as provided by Section 1-9-102 of


this title. Law enforcement and the Department shall exchange


investigation information.


6. The investigation or assessment shall include an inquiry


into whether the person responsible for the health, safety or


welfare of the child is an active duty service member of the


military or the spouse of an active duty service member. The


Department shall collect and report information related to the


military affiliation of the person or spouse responsible for the


health, safety or welfare of the child to the designated federal


authorities at the federal military installation where the service


member is assigned as provided by paragraph 4 of subsection A of


Section 1-2-102 of this title.



Req. No. 3386 Page 5


C. 1. Every physician, surgeon, or other health care provider


making a report of abuse or neglect as required by this section or


examining a child to determine the likelihood of abuse or neglect


and every hospital or related institution in which the child was


examined or treated shall provide copies of the results of the


examination or copies of the examination on which the report was


based and any other clinical notes, x-rays, photographs, and other


previous or current records relevant to the case to law enforcement


officers conducting a criminal investigation into the case and to


employees of the Department conducting an assessment or


investigation of alleged abuse or neglect in the case.


2. As necessary in the course of conducting an assessment or


investigation, the Department may request and obtain, without a


court order, copies of all prior medical records of a child


including, but not limited to, hospital records, medical, and dental


records. The physician-patient privilege shall not constitute


grounds for failure to produce such records.


D. 1. The Department shall engage in a collaborative decision-


making process to address each child’s needs related to safety and


whether the child’s condition warrants a safety intervention


including but not limited to a change in placement, and:


a. those involved in the collaborative decision-making


process shall include at a minimum appropriate



Req. No. 3386 Page 6


Department staff, the parents of the child and, if the


parent requests, an advocate or representative,


b. to protect the safety of those involved and to promote


efficiency, the Department may limit participants as


determined to be in the best interests of the child,


c. the Department shall make reasonable efforts to


provide a trained facilitator to guide the decision-


making process, and


d. any determination that a collaborative decision-making


process is not possible or is unnecessary shall


require supervisor approval and documentation of the


reasons supporting the determination.


2. If, before the assessment or investigation is complete, the


Department determines that immediate removal of the child is


necessary to protect the child from further abuse or neglect, the


Department shall recommend that the child be taken into custody and,


if feasible, utilize the collaborative decision-making process


provided by paragraph 1 of this subsection prior to the emergency


custody hearing.


E. The Department shall make a complete written report of the


investigation. The investigation report, together with its


recommendations, shall be submitted to the appropriate district


attorney’s office. Reports of assessment recommendations shall be


submitted to appropriate district attorneys.

Req. No. 3386 Page 7


F. The Department, where appropriate and in its discretion,


shall identify prevention- and intervention-related services


available in the community and refer the family to or arrange for


such services when an investigation or assessment indicates the


family would benefit from such services, or the Department may


provide such services directly. The Department shall document in


the record its attempts to provide, refer or arrange for the


provision of voluntary services and shall determine within sixty


(60) days whether the family has accessed those services directly


related to safety of the child. If the family refuses voluntary


services or does not access those services directly related to


safety of the child, and it is determined by the Department that the


child’s surroundings endanger the health, safety, or welfare of the


child, the Department may recommend that the child be placed in


protective or emergency custody or that a petition be filed.


G. If the Department has reason to believe that a person


responsible for the health, safety, and welfare of the child may


remove the child from the state before the investigation is


completed, the Department may request the district attorney to file


an application for a temporary restraining order in any district


court in the State of Oklahoma without regard to continuing


jurisdiction of the child. Upon cause shown, the court may enter a


temporary restraining order prohibiting the parent or other person



Req. No. 3386 Page 8


from removing the child from the state pending completion of the


assessment or investigation.


H. The Director of the Department or designee may request an


investigation be conducted by the Oklahoma State Bureau of


Investigation or other law enforcement agency in cases where it


reasonably believes that criminally injurious conduct including, but


not limited to, physical or sexual abuse of a child has occurred.


I. Child Welfare Services, in collaboration with the


Developmental Disabilities Services Division, shall implement a


protocol to be used in cases where the subject child is a child with


a disability who has complex medical needs, and the protocol shall


include, but not be limited to: resource coordination, medical


consultation or medical evaluation, when needed.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3386 BLB 1/14/2026 12:44:25 PM

















Req. No. 3386 Page 9